District of Columbia statutes.
13-444

Service of subpoena.

A subpoena issued by a Clerk of Superior Court under § 13-443 shall be served in compliance with § 11-942 and applicable rules of the Superior Court for the service of subpoenas.

History

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.